Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 20
DRIVER LICENSE COMPACT

Sec.

§ 49-2001. Enactment of compact.

The driver license compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joined therein in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I

ARTICLE II

ARTICLE III

Reports of Conviction

The licensing authority of a party state shall report each conviction of a person from another party state occurring within its jurisdiction to the licensing authority of the home state of the licensee. Such report shall clearly identify the person convicted; describe the violation specifying the section of the statute, code or ordinance violated; identify the court in which action was taken; indicate whether a plea of guilty or not guilty was entered, or the conviction was a result of the forfeiture of bail, bond or other security; and shall include any special findings made in connection therewith.

ARTICLE IV

ARTICLE V

ARTICLE VII

ARTICLE VIII

ARTICLE IX

§ 49-2002. Expenses of compact administrator.

The compact administrator provided for in Article VII of the compact shall not be entitled to any additional compensation on account of his service as the administrator, but shall be entitled to expenses incurred in connection with his duties and responsibilities as administrator, in the same manner as for expenses incurred in connection with any other duties or responsibilities of his office or employment.

§ 49-2003. Judicial review of compact enforcement.

Any act or omission of any official or employee of this state done or omitted pursuant to, or in enforcing, the provisions of the driver license compact shall be subject to review by the district court of Ada County or of any other county in which the person aggrieved shall reside, upon a petition therefor filed within thirty (30) days thereafter, but any review of the validity of any conviction reported pursuant to the compact shall be limited to establishing the identity of the person so convicted.

§ 49-2004 — 49-2009. Vehicle equipment safety compact. [Repealed.]